California statutes. Education Code
(B) The institution shall comply with the Eligible Training Provider List policy developed by the California Workforce Development Board.

(C) The institution shall not charge a student who is a recipient of funding under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.) any institutional charges, as defined in Section 94844, for
 attending and participating in the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 4.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94874.1.

(a) The bureau shall not verify the exemption from this chapter of, or contract for the complaint handling for, a nonprofit institution that operated as a for-profit institution during any period on or after January 1, 2010, unless the Attorney General verifies all of the following:

(1) The nonprofit institution acquired the for-profit institution’s assets for no more than the fair value of the assets.

(2) The nonprofit institution has not executed agreements for goods or services exceeding the fair value of the goods or services.

(3) All core
 functions of the nonprofit institution are conducted by, or under the direction of, the nonprofit institution.

(4) The nonprofit institution has not entered into any contracts, loans, or leases with a term of longer than three years with the former for-profit institution’s owners and managers. This paragraph does not apply to a nonprofit institution that previously operated as a for-profit institution that is owned by or controlled by a public institution of higher learning.

(b) An action under subdivision (a) may be appealed to the superior court.

(c) “Fair value” shall be demonstrated through one of the following:

(1) A third-party appraisal based on
 comparable assets acquired by, or goods or services procured by, nonprofit corporations in similar market conditions.

(2) Independent financing of the acquisition or procurement based upon the asset acquired or goods or services procured.

(3) Full and open competition in the acquisition of the assets or procurement of the goods or services.

(d) Within 90 days of the receipt of all information the Attorney General has determined is necessary for its verification pursuant to subdivision (a), the Attorney General shall notify the institution and the bureau in writing of the Attorney General’s verification pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 153, Sec. 5.   (AB 70)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94874.2.

Beginning January 1, 2016, an institution that is approved to participate in veterans’ financial aid programs pursuant to Section 21.4253 of Title 38 of the Code of Federal Regulations that is not an independent institution of higher education, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 66010, shall not be exempt from this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 6.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94874.5.

An institution that is otherwise exempt from this chapter shall comply with the requirements of Section 94927.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 7.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94874.7.

The bureau shall establish, by regulation, a process pursuant to which an institution that is exempt from this chapter may request, and obtain, from the bureau verification that the institution is exempt. The verification shall be valid for a period of up to two years, as long as the institution maintains full compliance with the requirements of the exemption. The bureau shall establish a reasonable fee to reimburse the bureau’s costs associated with the implementation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 593, Sec. 8.   (SB 1192)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94874.8.

(a) An institution exempt from all or part of this chapter pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 94874 or Section 94874.1 may apply to the bureau for an approval to operate pursuant to this section, but only subject to all of the following provisions:

(1) The bureau may approve the operation of an institution that is exempt from all or part of this chapter as specified above in accordance with the authority granted pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 94885). Upon issuing an approval to operate to an institution pursuant to this section, the bureau is authorized to regulate that institution through the full set of powers granted, and duties imposed, by this chapter, as those powers and duties would apply to an institution that is not exempt from this
 chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, upon issuance of an approval to operate pursuant to this section, the institution is no longer eligible for exemption, from the provisions of this chapter pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 94874 or Section 94874.1, unless authorized by subsequent legislation.

(3) Upon issuance of an approval to operate pursuant to this section, an institution is subject to all provisions of this chapter, and any regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, that apply to an institution subject to this chapter, except as expressly provided in paragraph (4).

(4) (A) With respect to the placement and salary or wage data required to be collected, calculated, and reported by Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928), an institution issued an approval to operate
 pursuant to this section is not required to report on its first School Performance Fact Sheet any data from the period prior to the date of the issuance of the approval to operate that the institution was not required to collect and does not have available to it. An institution shall, however, report available data collected and calculated in accordance with this chapter and applicable regulations, regardless of the purpose for which the data was collected. If the required data is unavailable, the institution shall also disclose the unavailability of the data on all documents required by this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. Upon receiving an approval to operate pursuant to this section, an institution shall commence to collect and calculate all information necessary to comply with Article 16 (commencing with Section 94928).

(B) An institution receiving an approval to operate pursuant to this section shall provide to
 prospective students the School Performance Fact Sheet, file that fact sheet with the bureau, and post it on the institution’s internet website no later than the first August 1 after the institution is approved to operate and no later than August 1 of each year thereafter. These School Performance Fact Sheets shall report data for the previous two calendar years based upon the number of students who began the program or the number of graduates for each reported calendar year. If two calendar years have not passed since the issuance of the approval to operate by the August 1 deadline for the School Performance Fact Sheet, unless data for two years is available, the institution shall report the required data for the period subsequent to the date of the issuance of the notice of approval.

(b) An institution exempt from all or part of this chapter pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 94874 or Section 94874.1 that was approved to operate by the
 bureau before the effective date of this section shall be deemed to have been approved pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 92.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94874.9.

(a) An independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, that is exempt from this chapter pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 94874 shall comply with all applicable state and federal laws, including laws relating to fraud, abuse, and false advertising.

(b) An institution described in subdivision (a) may execute a contract with the bureau for the bureau to review and, as appropriate, act on complaints concerning the institution, in accordance with Section 600.9 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) The execution of a contract by the bureau with an institution pursuant to subdivision (b) shall constitute establishment by the state of that institution to offer
 programs beyond secondary education, including programs leading to a degree or certificate, in accordance with Section 600.9 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) The bureau shall use a standard form contract for purposes of this section.

(e) A contract executed pursuant to this section shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Require an institution to do all of the following:

(A) Cooperate with the bureau to resolve complaints received pursuant to this section.

(B) Provide the following disclosure notice in all written and internet-based documentation in which the institution’s complaint process is described, including the student catalog, student handbook, and the
 institution’s internet website:
“An individual may contact the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education for review of a complaint. The bureau may be contacted at (address), Sacramento, CA (ZIP Code), (internet website address), (telephone and fax numbers).”
(C) Designate a person at the institution to act as a liaison to the bureau.

(D) Pay one thousand seventy-six dollars ($1,076) each year for costs incurred by the bureau to perform activities pursuant to the contract, unless another amount is determined by the bureau.

(2) (A) Authorize the bureau, for any complaint it receives, including any complaints related to the institution’s policies or procedures, or both, as
 determined by the bureau, to refer the complaint to the institution, an accrediting agency, or another appropriate entity for resolution.

(B) The bureau shall notify the complainant and the institution of a referral.

(C) This paragraph shall not be construed to relieve the bureau of its responsibility to ensure that a complaint it has referred for purposes of resolution is resolved by the receiving entity.

(f) The bureau may terminate a contract executed pursuant to this section if an institution is no longer an independent institution of higher education as defined in Section 66010 or fails to comply with the provisions of the contract.

(g) All moneys collected by the bureau that relate to a contract executed pursuant to this section, including
 payments collected in accordance with subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), shall be deposited in the Private Postsecondary Education Administration Fund.

(h) The bureau shall maintain, on its internet website, both of the following:

(1) The provisions of the standard form contract used for purposes of this section.

(2) A list of institutions with which the bureau has executed a contract pursuant to this section.

(i) On or before February 1, 2017, and each year thereafter, the bureau shall report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature regarding implementation of this section. The report shall include all of the following information:

(1) A list of institutions with which the bureau has executed a contract pursuant to this section.

(2) The total number of complaints received by the bureau relating to institutions listed in paragraph (1).

(3) The general nature of those complaints.

(4) The total number of those complaints referred to another entity, disaggregated by the entity to which each complaint was referred.

(5) The total number of complaints resolved, disaggregated by the entity that resolved each complaint.

(6) The total number of complaints pending, disaggregated by the entity to which each complaint was referred.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of General Services, at the request of the bureau, may exempt contracts executed pursuant to this section from any laws, rules, resolutions, or procedures that are otherwise applicable to public contracts that the Department of General Services administers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 93.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bureau Powers and Duties [94875. - 94884.]

94875.

The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, as established by Section 6 of Chapter 635 of the Statutes of 2007, is continued in existence and shall commence operations. This chapter establishes the functions and responsibilities of the bureau, for the purposes of Section 6 of Chapter 635 of the Statutes of 2007. The bureau shall regulate private postsecondary educational institutions through the powers granted, and duties imposed, by this chapter. In exercising its powers, and performing its duties, the protection of the public shall be the bureau’s highest priority. If protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94876.

(a) The powers and duties set forth in this chapter are vested in the Director of Consumer Affairs, who may delegate them to a bureau chief, subject to this section. The bureau chief shall work in collaboration with the director. The director is responsible for the implementation of this chapter and they shall ensure that the protection of the public is the bureau’s highest priority.

(b) The bureau chief shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and is exempt from the State Civil Service Act pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) Each power granted to, or duty imposed upon, the bureau under this chapter shall be exercised and performed in the name of the bureau, subject to any conditions and limitations the director may prescribe. The bureau chief may delegate any powers or duties to a designee.

(d) As may be necessary to carry out this chapter, the director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, may appoint and fix the compensation of personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 81.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94877.

(a) The bureau shall adopt and shall enforce regulations to implement this chapter pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) The bureau shall develop and implement an enforcement program, pursuant to Article 18 (commencing with Section 94932) to implement this chapter. The enforcement program shall include a plan for investigating complaints filed with the bureau. The bureau shall contract with the office of the Attorney General, or other appropriate state agency, to establish a process for the bureau’s staff to be trained to investigate complaints, including, but not limited to, the information, evidence, and
 materials needed to process complaints.

(c) The bureau shall institute training to ensure that its staff are equipped to review and verify the accuracy of the data contained in consumer disclosures, including, but not limited to, the School Performance Fact Sheet.

(d) The bureau shall establish a program to proactively identify unlicensed institutions, identify material or repeated violations of this chapter and regulations implementing this chapter, and take all appropriate legal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 840, Sec. 13.   (SB 1247)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94878.

(a) The bureau shall establish an internet website that includes at least all of the following information:

(1) An explanation of the bureau’s scope of authority.

(2) (A) A directory of approved institutions, and a link, if feasible, to the internet website of each institution.

(B) For each institution, the directory shall be developed in a manner that allows the user to search by institution and shall include all of the following information:

(i) The status of the institution’s approval to operate.

(ii) The information provided by the institutions, including, but not limited to, the annual report, as required by Section 94934, including the school catalog and the School Performance Fact Sheet. The School Performance Fact Sheet shall be maintained on the directory for at least five years after the date of its submission to the bureau.

(iii) If a law school satisfies the requirements of this chapter regarding a School Performance Fact Sheet by complying with the requirements of Section 94910.5, the bureau shall include the information provided by the institution pursuant to Section 94910.5 on its internet website and shall maintain the information in the same manner as required by clause (ii).

(iv) The disciplinary history of the institution, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(I) Pending formal accusations filed by the bureau.

(II) Suspensions, revocations, citations, fines, infractions, probations, pending litigation filed by the bureau, and final judgments resulting from litigation filed by the bureau.

(III) Pending or final civil or criminal cases filed by the Attorney General, a city attorney, or a district attorney in this state, or filed in any state by an attorney general or a federal regulatory or prosecutorial agency of which the bureau has received notice.

(IV) Final administrative actions by the United States Department of Education, including orders requiring restitution to students.

(V) All disciplinary actions ordered by an accreditation agency, including any order to show cause, of which the
 bureau has received notice pursuant to Section 94934 or other information otherwise publicly available of which the bureau has received notice.

(b) The bureau shall maintain the internet website described in subdivision (a). The bureau shall ensure that the information specified in subdivision (a) is kept current. The bureau shall update the internet website at least annually, to coincide with the submission of annual reports by the institutions pursuant to Section 94934.

(c) (1) The bureau shall post on its internet website a list of all institutions that were denied approval to operate, after the denial is final, and describe in clear and conspicuous language the reason the institution was denied approval. The bureau shall include with this list the statement provided in paragraph (2) on its internet website:

(2) “The following institutions were denied approval to operate by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education for failing to satisfy the standards relating to educational quality, or consumer protection, or both. These unlicensed institutions are not operating in compliance with the law, and students are strongly discouraged from attending these institutions.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 94.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94880.

(a) There is within the bureau a 12-member advisory committee. The members of the committee shall be appointed as follows:

(1) Three members, who shall have a demonstrated record of advocacy on behalf of consumers, of which the director, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint one member.

(2) Two members, who shall be current or past students of institutions, appointed by the director.

(3) Three members, who shall be representatives of institutions, appointed by the director.

(4) One public member appointed by the Senate Committee on
 Rules.

(5) One public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(6) Two nonvoting, ex officio members as follows:

(A) The chair of a policy committee of the Assembly with jurisdiction over legislation relating to the bureau appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. The chair may designate a representative for any meeting or meetings the chair is unable to attend.

(B) The chair of a policy committee of the Senate with jurisdiction over legislation relating to the bureau appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. The chair may designate a representative for any meeting or meetings the chair is unable to attend.

(b) (1) A member appointed pursuant to paragraph
 (2), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) shall not, either at the time of the member’s appointment or during the member’s tenure in office, have any financial interest in any organization currently or previously subject to regulation by the bureau, be a close family member of an employee, officer, or the director of any institution subject to regulation by the bureau, or currently have, or previously have had, a business relationship, in the five years preceding the member’s appointment, with any institution subject to regulation by the bureau.

(2) A member appointed pursuant to paragraph (2), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) shall not, within the five years immediately preceding the member’s appointment, have engaged in pursuits on behalf of an institution or institutional accreditor or have provided representation to the postsecondary educational industry or a profession regulated by the bureau, if the member is employed in the industry or a member
 of the profession, respectively, and the member shall not engage in those pursuits or provide that representation during the member’s term of office.

(c) The advisory committee shall examine the oversight functions and operational policies of the bureau and advise the bureau with respect to matters relating to private postsecondary education and the administration of this chapter, including annually reviewing the fee schedule and the equity of the schedule relative to the way institutions are structured, and the licensing and enforcement provisions of this chapter. The advisory committee shall make recommendations with respect to policies, practices, and regulations relating to private postsecondary education, and shall provide any assistance as may be requested by the bureau.

(d) The bureau shall actively seek input from, and consult with, the advisory committee regarding the
 development of regulations to implement this chapter before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of its regulations, and provide the advisory committee with sufficient time to review and comment on those regulations. The bureau shall take into consideration and respond to all feedback provided by members of the advisory committee.

(e) The bureau chief shall attend all advisory committee meetings and shall designate staff to provide ongoing administrative support to the advisory committee.

(f) Until January 1, 2017, the director shall personally attend, and testify and answer questions at, each meeting of the advisory committee.

(g) The Chief of the Office of Student Assistance and Relief established in Article 20.6 (commencing with Section 94949.7) shall attend, and testify and answer questions at, each meeting of the
 advisory committee.

(h) The advisory committee shall have the same access to records within the Department of Consumer Affairs related to the operation and administration of this chapter as do members of constituent boards of the department in regard to records related to their functions.

(i) Advisory committee meetings shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Advisory committee meeting materials shall be posted on the internet. A majority of the voting members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the committee’s meetings.

(j) The advisory committee shall meet at least quarterly and shall appoint a member of the committee to represent the committee for purposes of communicating
 with the Legislature.

(k) The Department of Consumer Affairs shall review, and revise if necessary, the department’s conflicts of interest regulations to ensure that each advisory committee member is required to disclose conflicts of interest to the public.

(l) The advisory committee shall elect annually from among its members a chair and vice chair. A member shall not serve in the chair or vice chair position for more than a combined two years.

(m) The advisory committee shall adopt reasonable rules for the conduct of its affairs consistent with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 5.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94881.

The bureau may conduct workshops to provide applicants and institutions information on application processes, compliance with this chapter, best practices for providing postsecondary educational programs, and other subjects concerning postsecondary education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94882.

The bureau may empanel visiting committees to assist in evaluating an institution’s application for an approval to operate. The members of visiting committees shall serve at no expense to the state, except that the bureau may reimburse the members of visiting committees for actual travel and per diem expenses incurred during the evaluation. The bureau may seek reimbursement for the travel and per diem costs from the institution that is the subject of an evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94883.

(a) Any individual serving on a visiting committee who provides information to the bureau, or its staff, in the course of evaluating any institution, or who testifies in any administrative hearing arising under this chapter, is entitled to a defense and indemnification in any action arising out of the information or testimony provided as if they were a public employee.

(b) Any defense and indemnification shall be solely with respect to the action pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 825) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of, and Part 7 (commencing with Section 995) of, Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 82.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94884.

The bureau is subject to Section 27 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 310, Sec. 6.   (AB 48)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Approval to Operate [94885. - 94892.]

94885.

(a) The bureau shall adopt by regulation minimum operating standards for an institution that shall reasonably ensure that all of the following occur:

(1) The content of each educational program can achieve its stated objective.

(2) The institution maintains specific written standards for student admissions for each educational program and those standards are related to the particular educational program.

(3) The facilities, instructional equipment, and materials are sufficient to enable students to achieve the educational program’s goals.

(4) The institution maintains a withdrawal policy and provides refunds.

(5) The directors, administrators, and faculty are properly qualified.

(6) The institution is financially sound and capable of fulfilling its commitments to students.

(7) That, upon satisfactory completion of an educational program, the institution gives students a document signifying the degree or diploma awarded.

(8) Adequate records and standard transcripts are maintained and are available to students.

(9) The institution is maintained and operated in
 compliance with this chapter and all other applicable ordinances and laws.

(b) Except as provided in Section 94885.1, an institution offering a degree must satisfy one of the following requirements:

(1) Accreditation by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, with the scope of that accreditation covering the offering of at least one degree program by the institution.

(2) An accreditation plan, approved by the bureau, for the institution to become fully accredited within five years of the bureau’s issuance of a provisional approval to operate to the institution’s degree programs. The provisional approval
 for the unaccredited institution to operate degree programs shall be in compliance with Section 94885.5.

(c) For institutions that are approved by means of accreditation and accredited by an agency that loses recognition by the United States Department of Education, an application for approval to operate an institution unaccredited shall be submitted to the bureau within six months of the agency’s loss of recognition. The application shall include an accreditation plan for the institution to become fully accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education within five years of the bureau’s issuance to the institution of a provisional approval to operate degree programs. If the institution fails to submit the required application and accreditation plan within six months of its
 accreditor’s loss of recognition, the institution shall cease to hold a valid approval to operate. The bureau shall review the submitted application and accreditation plan and issue the institution a provisional approval to operate degree programs within 18 months of the accreditor’s loss of recognition or deny the application, at which time the institution shall cease to hold a valid approval to operate. An unaccredited institution with a provisional approval to operate degree programs shall comply with Section 94885.5, except for paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 94885.5. The institution shall not seek bureau approval for additional degree programs until the institution regains accreditation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 544, Sec. 4.   (SB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94885.5.

(a) If an institution that has not been accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education seeks to offer one or more degree programs, the institution shall satisfy the following requirements in order to be issued a provisional approval to operate degree programs from the bureau:

(1) The institution may not offer more than two degree programs during the term of its provisional approval to operate degree programs.

(2) The institution shall submit an accreditation plan, approved by the bureau, for the institution to become fully accredited within five years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs. The plan shall include, at a minimum,
 identification of an accreditation agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, from which the institution plans to seek accreditation, and outline the process by which the institution will achieve accreditation candidacy or pre-accreditation within two years, and full accreditation within five years, of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs.

(3) The institution shall submit to the bureau all additional documentation the bureau deems necessary to determine if the institution will become fully accredited within five years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs.

(b) If an institution is granted a provisional approval to operate degree programs pursuant to subdivision (a), the following is required:

(1) Students seeking to enroll in that
 institution shall be notified in writing by the institution, before the execution of the student’s enrollment agreement, that the institution’s approval to operate is contingent upon it being subsequently accredited.

(2) Within the first two years of issuance of the provisional approval to operate degree programs, a visiting committee, empaneled by the bureau pursuant to Section 94882, shall review the institution’s application for approval and its accreditation plan, and make a recommendation to the bureau regarding the institution’s progress to achieving full accreditation.

(3) The institution shall provide evidence of accreditation candidacy or pre-accreditation within two years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs, and evidence of accreditation within five years of issuance of its provisional approval to operate degree programs, with the scope of
 that accreditation covering the offering of at least one degree program.

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an institution required to comply with this section that fails to do so by the dates provided, as required, or for which accreditation is removed or revoked by the accrediting agency, shall have its provisional approval to operate degree programs automatically suspended on the applicable date. The bureau shall issue an order suspending the institution’s degree programs and that suspension shall not be lifted until the institution complies with the requirements of this section or has its accreditation reinstated. An institution that has its degree programs suspended shall not enroll new students in any of its degree programs and shall execute a teach-out plan for its enrolled students in those degree programs.

(2) (A) This
 section does not prohibit an institution from voluntarily ceasing to pursue accreditation. An institution that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation shall immediately notify the bureau in writing of the institution’s intent to stop offering its degree programs and shall comply with all other applicable laws and regulations. Upon the bureau’s receipt of the notification, the institution’s approval to operate degree programs is deemed voluntarily surrendered.

(B) An institution offering both degree and nondegree programs that has its provisional approval to operate degree programs suspended or that voluntarily ceases to pursue accreditation may continue to offer its nondegree programs, subject to all other laws and regulations.

(C) An institution that is pursuing accreditation under this section shall not make a change in ownership, change in control, or change in business
 organization form pursuant to Sections 94893 and 94894 until the institution obtains full accreditation.

(d) (1) The bureau shall, upon the timely submission of sufficient evidence that an unaccredited institution is making strong progress toward obtaining accreditation, or if warranted by the accrediting agency’s conditions for applying for accreditation related to student enrollment or graduation, grant an institution’s request for an extension of time, not to exceed a combined total of five years, to meet the requirements of this section.

(2) Evidence submitted to the bureau pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, an amended accreditation plan adequately identifying why preaccreditation, accreditation candidacy, or accreditation outlined in the original plan submitted to the bureau was not achieved, active steps the institution is
 taking to comply with this section, and documentation from an accrediting agency demonstrating either the institution’s likely ability to meet the requirements of this section or the accrediting agency’s relevant conditions for an institution to apply for accreditation.

(3) The bureau may establish policies and procedures to comply with the requirements in this subdivision. Establishment of these policies and procedures are exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) An institution issued a provisional approval to operate degree programs under this section is required to comply with all other laws and regulations.

(f) The bureau shall adopt emergency regulations for purposes of implementing this section. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code. These emergency regulations shall become law through the regular rulemaking process within one year of the enactment of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 552, Sec. 7.   (SB 802)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 94950.)
-------------------------------------------

94885.7.

(a) When an institution offering at least one degree program has ceased to be accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, the institution shall notify the bureau immediately, but no more than seven days after it ceases to be accredited. The institution’s approval to operate degree programs shall become provisional as of the date that the institution ceases to be accredited.

(b) An institution that has had its approval to operate degree programs become provisional shall satisfy the following requirements in order to maintain its provisional approval to operate degree programs from the bureau:

(1) The institution shall not seek bureau approval for additional degree programs until the institution regains accreditation.

(2) Within six months of its approval to operate degree programs becoming provisional, the institution shall submit an accreditation plan, to be approved by the bureau, for the institution to become fully accredited within five years of the date of its provisional approval to operate degree programs. The plan shall include, at a minimum, identification of an accreditation agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, from which the institution plans to seek accreditation, and outline the process by which the institution will achieve accreditation candidacy or pre-accreditation within two years, and full accreditation within five years, of its
 provisional approval to operate degree programs.

(3) The institution shall submit to the bureau all additional documentation the bureau deems necessary to determine if the institution will become fully accredited within five years of its approval to operate degree programs being deemed provisional.

(c) An institution that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (b) shall comply with both of the following:
